Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3121
Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3121 to 77-3133 shall be known and may be cited as the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 1.